src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
#
# Tsuut'ina morphophonology
#

define vowel [a|á|à|à2|i|í|ì|o|ó|ò|u|ú|ù];
define unmarkedVowel [a|i|o|u];
define highToneVowel [á|í|ó|ú];
define lowToneVowel [à|ì|ò|ù];
define consonant [b|c|d|g|h|j|k|l|ł|m|n|p|s|t|w|x|y|z|ʔ|%'];


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to tone.
#

# The 0-IPFV 1PL.SBJ allomorph isaà-/isiì- has slightly different tonal
# behaviour from other prefixes that begin with i- in Tsuut'ina: before 0-IPFV
# 1PL.SBJ isaà-/isiì-, low-tone inflectional prefixes (e.g., dà- distributive
# plural) and lexical prefixes (e.g., nà- in lexemes like nàkuy "vomit" and
# nàmo "swim/bathe") combine to form Cv̀v̀saà-/Cv̀v̀siì- (i.e., LM -> LL, e.g.,
# dààsaàtsiy "each and every one of us is crying", from distributive plural
# dà- + isaàtsiy; or nààsaàmo "we both will swim/bathe", from lexical nà- + 
# isaàmo), rather than the expected *Caasaà-/*Caasiì- (i.e., LM -> MM, as is
# found in all other LM contexts).
#
# We model this by representing the initial vowel in isaà-/isiì- with the
# multi-character symbol <i2>, then handle this sandhi behaviour with a
# targetted rewrite rule.  (We currently only have evidence for this sandhi
# pattern after à–, so it's possible that this pattern actually only applies
# to that one vowel, rather than all low vowels.  If we come across instances
# of ì=, ò=, or ù= appearing immediately before 0-IPFV 1PL.SBJ that share
# this behaviour, this rule will need to be rewritten/expanded)
define toneSandhi1PL [ [ à2 | à ] "." i2 -> à ì ];

# Define LH -> MH (e.g., shì-á -> shaá, as in shaásʔín "I prepared food, made
# a feast", dà-á -> daá, as in daátłiyaàʔí "each and every one of us saw each
# other") HL -> HM (e.g., ná-ì -> náa, as in náaya "he/she got up"), and 
# LM -> MM (e.g., xà-i -> xaa, as in xaaʔò "s/he took something out", from
# xà- i- DOBJ.INDEF ʔò "handle solid object")
define toneSandhi à -> a, ì -> i, ò -> o, ù -> u || _ highToneVowel,
                                                    highToneVowel _,
                                                    _ unmarkedVowel;

# Certain high-tone prefixes in Tsuut'ina (e.g., tsí- "flee", or í- from 
# historical *uˑ-) spread high tone rightward onto unmarked vowels,
# stopping at the first inflectional chunk (e.g., íts'idiyískid "they were
# asked" comes out as íts'ídíyískid, with high tone spreading from í- onto
# ts'i- and di-, but stopping at yi-).  We mark this spreading high tone
# in lexical entries as an ^H after the vowel (e.g., tsí^H, í^H)
#
# For now, this rule applies to sequences of at most three unmarked syllables
# that appear after a spreading high tone.  If it turns out that there are
# words with a spreading high tone that involve more than three unmarked
# syllables before the inflectional chunk, this rule will need to change.
define hToneSpread [..] -> "^H" || 
    "^H" consonant+ unmarkedVowel+ _ [ \"^H" | "." ];

define hToneSpreadApply a a -> á á, a -> á,
                           i i -> í í, i -> í,
                           o o -> ó ó, o -> ó,
                           u u -> ú ú, u -> ú || _ "^H";

define hToneSpreadCleanup "^H" -> 0;

regex [ hToneSpread .o. 
        hToneSpread .o. 
        hToneSpread .o.
        hToneSpreadApply .o.
        hToneSpreadCleanup ];
define hToneSpreading;

# The ì- transitional (Leer 1996/2005) or inchoative/semelfactive (K. Rice
# 2000) prefix behaves differently from all other tone-bearing prefixes in
# Tsuut'ina, pulling down the tone of neighbouring vowels in inner and middle
# prefixes without adding a mora (e.g., gùja ánìstłàg "I did you (sg.) good",
# from á= ni_ ^L . is làg, with L . is -> ìs; gùja ásilàg "you (sg.) did me
# good", from á= si_ ^L . í làg, with ^L . í -> i).  This prefix does not
# affect the tone of vowels in outer prefixes, but instead behaves phonologī-
# cally like a moraic low-tone /ì/ (e.g., náayisʔoł "I am butchering it
# (progressive)", from ná= ^L . yis ʔoł, not *náyisʔoł or *nayisʔoł).
# 
# In the case of TAMA chunks, this prefix causes both short and level long
# vowels to drop by one level (e.g., í -> i, íí -> ii, etc.), while leaving
# contour tones (specifically, 0-IPFV 1PL aà/iì) unaffected.  In all other
# cases, only one mora is lowered (e.g., nánaàyistsòni "I will see you (pl.)
# again", from ná= naa_ ^L . yis tsòni, where naa ^L -> naà, rather than *nàà).
# To model this, we represent this prefix's tone as ^L, adjusting TAMA chunk
# tones first (i.e., apply the lowering to any vowel sequences immediately
# after the "." boundary marker), then to any adjacent vowel immediately to
# the left of this prefix.
define lToneLowerRight [ "." "^L" á á -> "." a a      .o.
                         "." "^L" á -> "." a          .o.
                         "." "^L" a à -> "." a à      .o.
                         "." "^L" a a -> "." à à      .o.
                         "." "^L" a -> "." à          .o.
                         "." "^L" í í -> "." i i      .o.
                         "." "^L" í -> "." i          .o.
                         "." "^L" i ì -> "." i ì      .o.
                         "." "^L" i i -> "." ì ì      .o.
                         "." "^L" i -> "." ì          .o.
                         "." "^L" ì -> "." ì          .o.
                         "." "^L" i2 -> "." ì ];
define lToneLowerLeft  á -> a, a -> à, í -> i, i -> ì,
                       ó -> o, o -> ò, ú -> u, u -> ù || _ "." "^L";
define lToneCleanup "^L" -> 0;

regex [ lToneLowerRight .o. lToneLowerLeft .o. lToneCleanup ];
define lToneLowering;

# As noted above, the transitional prefix does not pull down the tone of
# neighbouring vowels when those belong to a disjunct prefix.  Instead,
# immediately after a tone-bearing disjunct prefix when there are no following
# vowels whose tones could be lowered, the transitional prefix behaves like
# a moraic /ì/.
#
# (The only exception is the distributive plural dà-, which is a disjunct
# prefix, but after which ^L is not realized [e.g., náasʔoł "you both are
# butchering it", from ná=_^L.asʔoł; vs. nádàsʔoł "each and every one of you
# is butchering it", not *nádààsʔoł, from ná=dà_^L.asʔoł])
define lToneAfterDisjunctBoundary "^L" -> ì || 
                                        "=" "_" "." _ [ consonant | "^P" ];

# Enclitics cause open-syllable, mid-tone verb stems to become high tone.
# Whenever an enclitic is present after a stem, the symbol "^Encl" is
# produced, which allows us to adjust the tone accordingly.
define encliticMidToHighTone a -> á, i -> í, o -> ó, u -> ú || _ "^Encl" .o.
                             "^Encl" -> 0;

# Certain TAMA chunks in ni-PFV and si-PFV paradigms (as well as in morpho-
# logically identical stative forms) are preceded by a floating low tone that
# causes any immediately preceding inner prefix ending in a mid-tone vowel to
# become low (e.g., di . ^P sistł'o -> dìsistł'o "I ran", where the 1SG.SBJ
# si-PFV inner prefix TAMA chunk <sis> is preceded by a floating low tone
# represented in the FST by the symbol <^P>, which causes <di> to become <dì>).
#
# The only vowels that are attested in the morphological environment in which
# this floating low tone appears are /i/ and /u/ (e.g., areal direct object
# gu-, as in tágùsischíízh "I painted it [a place or space]"), making this
# process straightforward to model phonologically.  In all other environments,
# the floating low tone is not realized.
define perfectiveToneLowering i -> ì, u -> ù || _ "." "^P"  .o.  "^P" -> 0;


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to consonants.
#

# Stems that begin with /l/ and /ł/ combine with 2PL as- either as (a|à)ł or,
# for some speakers, as (a|à)stł (e.g., /as+lí/ "you.PL are" -> [ałí] or
# [astłí], /ídas+łù/ "you.PL are driving" -> [ídałù] or [ídastłù]).  We use
# the symbol 's2' to represent the /s/ in any 2PL inflectional chunks that
# are involved in this process.
define lInitialStemsSbjPl2 s2 [ l | ł ] -> [ ł | s l ] ;

# Phonotactic restriction: in general, /sl/ and /sł/ sequences should be
# resolved as /stł/ (e.g., /is+lí/ "I am" -> [istłí], /ídis+łù/ "I am driving"
# -> [ídistłù]).
define slDissimilation s [ l | ł ] -> s t ł;

# In the si-PFV, verb stems that begin with /l/ dissimilate to /dl/ when
# immediately preceded by an /s/ belonging to a 3SG, 3PL, or 4SG form. As
# the following partial paradigm for "manage to get well" (PFV stem <lít>)
# shows, this process does not appear with 1SG or 2PL forms, which behave
# phonologically as they do with /l/-initial stems in all other paradigms:
#
#   1SG.SBJ  dinásistłít        "I managed to get well" (Onespot-Sapir os07036)
#   2SG.SBJ  dinásílít          "you managed to get well"
#   3SG.SBJ  dinásilít          "he/she/it managed to get well"
#   1PL.SBJ  dinásaàlít         "we managed to get well"
#   2PL.SBJ  dinásałít          "you (pl.) managed to get well"
#   3PL.SBJ  dinágisdlít        "they managed to get well"
#   4SG.SBJ  dináts'isdlít      "someone managed to get well"
#
# We use the symbol 's3' to represent the final /s/ in any si-PFV inflectional
# chunks that are associated with this process.
define lInitialStemsSiPFV s3 l -> s d l;

# Some <y>-initial stems alternate with <sh> when preceded by /s/ (e.g., -yón
# "grow (perfective)", as in nìsishón "I grew up" vs. sìsíyón "you (sg.) grew
# up").  We represent the <y> in these stems in lexical entries as <y2>, then
# define the corresponding phonological alternation here.
define y2InitialStemAfterS [ s "y2" -> s h  .o.  "y2" -> y ];

# Some stems containing the vowel <a> alternate with <o> when preceded by
# <sh> (e.g., -yá(h) "walk, go (human non-pl.)", as in dishó "I will walk, go"
# and dashó "you (2) will walk, go" vs. díyá "you (sg.) will walk, go").  We
# treat this here as a productive alternation with the special character "^A",
# though in actuality, this 'process' is limited to a very small set of 
# lexemes.
define aVowelAlternation a -> o, á -> ó, à -> ò || s h _ "^A" .o. "^A" -> 0 ;

# Some stems ending in /n/ may appear with or without that consonant when it
# occurs word-finally (e.g., sistí ~ sistín "I am sleeping") or before an
# enclitic (e.g., sití-la ~ sitín-la "it was lying there (living being)").
# That same /n/ # is always present when it is not in word-final position
# (e.g., when a suffix is present, e.g,. sistíní dósa "because I am sleeping",
# not *sistíí dósa).
#
# We represent the alternating word-final /n/ found in these stems as <n2> in
# lexical entries, then handle the corresponding phonological alternation here.
define n2FinalStems [ "n2" -> [ 0 | n ] || _ [ .#. | "-" ]  .o.  "n2" -> n ];

# Likewise, but for optional, word-final /g/ (e.g., ástłà ~ ástłàg "I made it,
# I did it"), which is represented as <g2> in lexical entries.
define g2FinalStems [ "g2" -> [ 0 | g ] || _ [ .#. | "-" ]  .o.  "g2" -> g ];

# Change szh -> sh (mách'ìguniszhoh -> mách'ìgunisshoh "I don't know") (This
# rule may need to change; some people prefer to spell these forms without the
# second /s/)
define zhDevoicing z -> s || s _ h;

# Change sz -> ss (dìszày -> dìssày "he/she/it went hunting") (This rule may
# need to change; some people prefer to spell these forms without the second
# /s/)
define zDevoicing z -> s || s _;

# Change sgh -> sx (isghàł -> isxàł "I am whipping (something), cracking a
# whip"; cf. isaàghàł "we are whipping (something), cracking a whip")
##define ghDevoicing {gh} -> x || s _;


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to vowel length and quality.
#

# When combined with distributive dà-, 2PL.SBJ as-/às- is realized as dàs-
# (i.e., with a short vowel).
define distributivePluralBefore2PL [ a | à ] -> 0 || à2 "." _ s2  .o.
                                          à2 -> à;
